test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AN_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - dlán - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AN_STEM_1

     dlán+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: dlán
     dlán+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: dlán.ga
     dlán+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dlán
     dlán+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dlán.gang
     dlán+V+DIRECT+PAST: dlán.gan
     dlán+V+RELATIVE: dláns
     dlán+V+NON_FACTIVE: dlánang
     dlán+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: dlán.gang
     dlán+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: dlán.ganggang
     dlán+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: dlán.gangang
     dlán+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: dlán.giinii
     dlán+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: dlán.gaangaa
     dlán+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: dlán.gaangaan
     dlán+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: dlánäsaa
     dlán+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: dlánäs
     dlán+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: dlánäsaang
     dlán+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: dlánäsga
     dlán+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: dlánäsaas
     dlán+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: dlánäsaa.ang
     dlán+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: dlánang k̲asa'áa
     dlán+V+NEAR+FUTURE: dlánang k̲asa'áang
     dlán+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: dlánang k̲asaasdláa
     dlán+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: dlánang k̲asaasdláang
     dlán+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: dlán'uuj
     dlán+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dlán'uujang
     dlán+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: dlánäsaa'uujang
     dlán+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: dlán'us
     dlán+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: dlán'ujaa
     dlán+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: dlán'uujaangaa
     dlán+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: dlánäsaa'us
     dlán+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: dlánäsaa'ahlans
     dlán+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: dlánäseehl
     dlán+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: dlán'uu
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: dlán'waa
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dlán'waa
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dlán'waang
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: dlán'wägan
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: dlán'aawaa
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: dlán'aawaan
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: dlán'waas
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: dlán'aawaas
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: dlán'waa.ang
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: dlán'aawaa.ang
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: dlán.gang'waa
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: dlán.gang'waang
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: dlán.gang'waa.ang
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: dlán'wägiinii
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: dlán'wägaangaa
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: dlán'wägaangaan
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: dlán'waaäsaa
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: dlán'waaäs
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: dlán'waaäsaang
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: dlán'waaäsga
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: dlán'waaäsaas
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: dlán'waaäsaa.ang
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: dlán'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: dlán'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: dlán'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: dlán'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: dlán'waa'uuj
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dlán'waa'uujang
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: dlán'waaäsaa'uujang
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: dlán'waa'us
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: dlán'waa'ujaa
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: dlán'waa'uujaangaa
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: dlán'waaäsaa'us
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: dlán'waa'ahlanggang
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: dlán'waa'ahlanggan
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: dlán'waa'ahlanggiinii
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: dlán'waaäsaa'ahlans
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: dlán'waa'ahlans
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: dlán'aawaa'ahlang
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: dlán'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: dlán'aawaa'ahlanggang
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: dlán'waa'ahl
     dlán+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: dlán'waaäseehl
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: dlán'ang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: dlán'angga
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dlán'ang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dlán'anggang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: dlán'anggan
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: dlán'aangaa
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: dlán'aangaan
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: dlán'ans
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: dlán'aangaas
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: dlán'angang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: dlán'aangaa.ang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: dlán'anggang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: dlán.gang'anggang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: dlán.gang'angang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: dlán'anggiinii
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: dlán'anggaangaa
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: dlán'anggaangaan
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: dlán'angäsaa
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: dlán'angäs
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: dlán'angäsaang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: dlán'angäsga
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: dlán'angäsaas
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: dlán'angäsaa.ang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: dlánang k̲asaa'áng
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: dlánang k̲asaa'ánggang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: dlánang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: dlánang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: dlán'ang'uuj
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dlán'ang'uujang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: dlán'angäsaa'uujang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: dlán'ang'us
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: dlán'ang'ujaa
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: dlán'ang'uujaangaa
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: dlán'angäsaa'us
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: dlán'aang'ahlanggang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: dlán'aang'ahlanggan
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: dlán'aang'ahlanggiinii
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: dlán'angäsaa'ahlans
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: dlán'aang'ahlans
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: dlán'aangaa'ahlang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: dlán'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: dlán'aangaa'ahlanggang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: dlán'aang'ahl
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: dlán'angäseehl
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: dlán'ang'uu
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: dlán'ang'waa
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dlán'ang'waa
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dlán'ang'waang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: dlán'ang'wägan
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: dlán'ang'aawaa
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: dlán'ang'aawaan
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: dlán'ang'waas
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: dlán'ang'aawaas
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: dlán'ang'waa.ang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: dlán'ang'aawaa.ang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: dlán.gang'ang'waa
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: dlán.gang'ang'waang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: dlán.gang'ang'waa.ang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: dlán'ang'wägiinii
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: dlán'ang'wägaangaa
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: dlán'ang'wägaangaan
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: dlán'ang'waaäsaa
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: dlán'ang'waaäs
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: dlán'ang'waaäsaang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: dlán'ang'waaäsga
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: dlán'ang'waaäsaas
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: dlán'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: dlán'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: dlán'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: dlán'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: dlán'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: dlán'ang'waa'uuj
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dlán'ang'waa'uujang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: dlán'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: dlán'ang'waa'us
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: dlán'ang'waa'ujaa
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: dlán'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: dlán'ang'waaäsaa'us
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: dlán'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: dlán'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: dlán'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: dlán'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: dlán'ang'waa'ahlans
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: dlán'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: dlán'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: dlán'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: dlán'ang'waa'ahl
     dlán+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: dlán'ang'waaäseehl
